Utah statutes.
59-12-2210.   Seller or certified service provider reliance on commission
information.
A seller or certified service provider is not liable for failing to collect a
sales and use tax at a tax rate imposed under this part if the seller's or
certified service provider's failure to collect the sales and use tax is as a
result of the seller's or certified service provider's reliance on incorrect
data provided by the commission in a database created by the commission:
(1)  containing tax rates, boundaries, or local taxing jurisdiction
assignments; or
(2)  indicating the taxability of tangible personal property, a product
transferred electronically, or a service.
